Nebraska statutes.
Reissue Revised Statutes of Nebraska28-3,106
Abortion; performance; restrictions.

No person shall
perform or induce or attempt to perform or induce an abortion upon a woman
when it has been determined, by the physician performing or inducing the abortion
or by another physician upon whose determination that physician relies, that
the probable postfertilization age of the woman's unborn child is twenty or
more weeks unless, in reasonable medical judgment (1) she has a condition
which so complicates her medical condition as to necessitate the abortion
of her pregnancy to avert her death or to avert serious risk of substantial
and irreversible physical impairment of a major bodily function or (2) it
is necessary to preserve the life of an unborn child. No such condition shall
be deemed to exist if it is based on a claim or diagnosis that the woman will
engage in conduct which would result in her death or in substantial and irreversible
physical impairment of a major bodily function. In such a case, the physician
shall terminate the pregnancy in the manner which, in reasonable medical judgment,
provides the best opportunity for the unborn child to survive, unless, in
reasonable medical judgment, termination of the pregnancy in that manner would
pose a greater risk either of the death of the pregnant woman or of the substantial
and irreversible physical impairment of a major bodily function of the woman
than would another available method. No such greater risk shall be deemed
to exist if it is based on a claim or diagnosis that the woman will engage
in conduct which would result in her death or in substantial and irreversible
physical impairment of a major bodily function.

Laws 2010, LB1103, § 5.